Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1241.01
Core services; appropriation;
legislative intent.

To carry out section 79-1241.03, it is
the intent of the Legislature to appropriate for each fiscal year the amount
appropriated in the prior year increased by the percentage growth in the fall
membership of member districts plus the basic allowable growth rate described
in section 79-1025. For purposes of this section, fall membership has the
same meaning as in section 79-1003. Fall membership data used to compute growth
shall be from the two most recently available fall membership reports.

Laws 1998, LB 1110, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 386, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 1208, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB603, § 25;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 47;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 28.